North Dakota, session 69, HB1153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 7 of section 49-23-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
7. "Excavation" means any operation in which earth, rock, or other materials in or below the
ground is moved or otherwise displaced by means of hand or power tools, power equipment,
or explosives and includes grading, trenching, digging, ditching, dredging, drilling, augering,
tunneling, boring, scraping, and cable or pipe plowing and driving. The term does not include:
a. Opening a grave in a cemetery.
b. Plowing, cultivating, planting, harvesting, and similar operations in connection with
agricultural activities, unless any of these activities disturbs the soil to a depth of eighteen
inches [45.72 centimeters] or more.
c. Gardening and landscaping unless it disturbs the soil to a depth of twelve inches [30.48
centimeters] or more.
d. Normal maintenance of paved roads and streets if the maintenance does not change the
original gradeextend deeper than the depth of the existing pavement and does not
involve the road ditch.
e. Normal surface maintenance of gravel roads and streets if the maintenance does not
involve the road ditch.
e.f. Normal repair and maintenance of track and track bed by a railroad on its own right of
way.

H. B. NO. 1153 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1153.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State